Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.085

Gambling commission—Members and employees—Activities prohibited.

A member or employee of the gambling commission shall not:

(1) Serve as an officer or manager of any corporation or organization which conducts a lottery or gambling activity;

(2) Receive or share in, directly or indirectly, the gross profits of any gambling activity regulated by the commission;

(3) Be beneficially interested in any contract for the manufacture or sale of gambling devices, the conduct of [a] gambling activity, or the provision of independent consultant services in connection with a gambling activity.

[ 1986 c 4 s 1.]